Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 10 Railroad and Public Highway Crossings

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Customary or statutory signal from train as measure of railroad's duty as to warning at highway crossing, 5 ALR2d 112.

Pedestrian attempting to pass over, under, or between cars obstructing crossing, 27 ALR2d 369.

Contributory negligence of driver of motor vehicle at railroad crossing where his vision is obscured by smoke, dust, atmospheric condition, or unclean windshield, 42 ALR2d 13.

Rights of injured guest in vehicle involved in railroad crossing accident as affected by obscured vision from vehicle, 42 ALR2d 350.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to cut weeds, brush, or other vegetation obstructing or obscuring view at railroad crossing or at street or highway intersection, 42 ALR2d 817.

Admissibility, in railroad crossing accident case, of evidence of other functional failures of railroad crossing devices and appliances of the same kind at other times, 46 ALR2d 935.

Jumping from moving motor vehicle and being hit by railroad car at crossing, 52 ALR2d 1433.

Liability for injury or death of pedestrian due to condition of surface of crossing, 64 ALR2d 1199.

Duty and standard of care, with respect to contributory negligence, of person with physical handicap, such as impaired vision or hearing, approaching railroad crossing, 65 ALR2d 703.

Contributory negligence of driver of motor vehicle driven without lights or with defective or inadequate lights and struck at railroad crossing, 67 ALR2d 118, 62 ALR3d 560, 62 ALR3d 771, 62 ALR3d 844.

Last clear chance doctrine applied to cases involving collision between train and motor vehicle at railroad crossing, 70 ALR2d 9.

Applicability of evidence of train speed prior to grade-crossing accident, and competency of witness to testify thereto, 83 ALR2d 1329.

Injury due to road vehicle running into train or car standing on highway crossing, 84 ALR2d 813.

Railroad's liability for crossing collision as affected by fact that train or engine was backing or engine was pushing train, 85 ALR2d 267.

Failure of signaling device at crossing to operate, as affecting railroad company's liability, 90 ALR2d 350.

Liability to owner or occupant of motor vehicle for accident allegedly resulting from defective condition of road surface at crossing, 91 ALR2d 10.

§ 37-10-101.
Highway crossing protection account established; purposes of account; use in connection with federal funds.

In order to promote the public safety and to provide for the payment of part of the costs of installing, reconstructing and improving automatic and other safety appliance signals or devices at crossings at grade of public highways, as defined in this act, roads or streets over the track or tracks of any railroad corporation or street railway corporation in the state, there is created an account known as the highway crossing protection account within the highway fund. Before any funds of the highway crossing protection account shall be used to pay any part of the cost of the installation, reconstruction, or improvement of any signals or devices at any crossing, the commission shall first determine that all federal sources of funding have been exhausted. When federal funds are being utilized, federal guidelines as indicated in 23 C.F.R. [part] 646 shall be followed. For purposes of this section, “commission” means the Wyoming transportation commission.

As used in this act:

“Public highways” means as specified in W.S.

24-1-101

, but shall not include private roads;

“This act” means W.S.

37-10-101

through

37-10-105

.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 138, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 161, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 51, § 1; 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

§ 37-10-102.
Power to close or establish crossings; establishing priority for hazardous crossing locations.

The transportation commission shall have the power and authority to close or establish crossings at grade of public highways as specified, or separations over or under the track or tracks of any railroad corporation or street railway corporation in the state of Wyoming.

Upon application to the commission from the duly authorized agents of the cities, counties or other governmental entities or the affected railroad for participation under the terms of this act or upon its own motion when the public interest clearly indicates action should be taken, the commission shall consider the need from the evidence presented, availed or adduced and shall establish a priority rating from the applications or evidence before the commission, assigning priority first to the most hazardous railroad crossing locations, giving proper weight to increased rail traffic and to the traffic volume over such crossing with due consideration being given for school buses and dangerous commodities. If the commission determines there is a need for grade crossing protection, then they shall determine the type of crossing protection required, including whether the crossing is to be made at grade or a grade separation structure. If the crossing be at grade, the commission shall determine the kind and type of grade crossing protection signals and devices required. If the crossing is to be a grade separation structure, the commission shall determine the kind and type of grade separation structure.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 138, § 2; 1967, ch. 121, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 161, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 37-10-101(b)(ii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety, under 49 USC § 10903(a), of interstate commerce commission's decision permitting railroad to abandon line or discontinue service, 77 ALR Fed 231.

§ 37-10-103.
Apportionment of cost of grade crossing devices and grade separation structures; between railroad and state, county and city government.

With respect to the installation of safety devices or safety equipment at railroad-highway crossings, under the direction of the affected railroad, it shall be the duty of the transportation commission to apportion the costs and expenses of installing or reconstructing the crossings and safety devices between the railroads and the department of transportation or the county, city or other governmental entity involved in proportion to the respective benefits to be derived, and to make the apportionment of the costs in accordance with state and federal rules and regulations.

With respect to the initial installation of grade separation structures at railroad public highway crossings, a grade separation structure shall be installed by the railroad at all new railroad crossings of public roads or state highways, after notifying the department of transportation of its intent to cross the public road or highway, and if deemed appropriate after evaluation by the transportation commission. All installations shall be in accordance with state and federal rules and regulations.

With respect to separation structures for roads over or under railroads, the commission shall first determine that all federal sources of funding have been exhausted, and then apportion the remaining costs and expenses of the initial installation of the grade separation structures between the railroad and the department of transportation or the county, city or other governmental entity involved, the apportionment to be based upon the causes resulting in the need for grade separation structures in accordance with state and federal rules and regulations. None of the money in the highway crossing protection account shall be used for payment of grade separation structures.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 138, § 3; 1977, ch. 161, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

§ 37-10-104.
Apportionment of cost of grade crossing devices and grade separation structures; administration of highway crossing protection account.

The transportation commission is charged with the administration of the highway crossing protection program. In order to compensate for the use of crossings by the public generally, the commission shall also order that one-half (1/2) of the cost of installing, reconstructing or improving signals or devices will be paid by the railroad corporation, and the balance of the costs will be divided between the state highway crossing protection account and the department of transportation or the city, town, county or other political entity in which the crossing is located in accordance with state and federal rules and regulations. The commission shall fix in each case the amount to be paid from the crossing protection account and the amount to be paid by the department or by the city, town, county or other political entity.

The railroads shall bear all costs of maintaining in good operating condition all crossing surfaces and warning devices.

The governmental agency or city, town, county or other political entity having jurisdiction over the highway and the separation structures which crosses over or under the railroad track or tracks, shall bear all cost of maintenance of its own separation structures. The railroad corporation shall bear all costs of maintenance of its own structures over or under a public highway. Maintenance of joint use structures shall be by agreement between the parties involved.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 138, § 4; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 161, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 51, § 1; 2001, ch. 200, § 2.

§ 37-10-105.
Transfer and credit of monies to account.

For the purpose of building up sufficient money to be used to defray the expenses of installation and reconstruction of automatic and other safety appliance signals and devices at railroad grade crossings, for the construction or the improvement of existing highway-railroad grade crossings to render them safe and consistent with modern highway construction practice, the custodian of the state highway fund shall reserve to the highway crossing protection account to be used to administer the program up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) per month. Monthly contributions shall continue until the unused balance in the account reaches the sum of two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000.00), and no further credits or transfers shall be made except during such time that the balance in the account is less than two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000.00).

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 138, § 5; 1967, ch. 122, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 161, § 1; 1992, ch. 51, § 1.